District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-2205.01

Prima facie evidence of intoxication; relevant evidence of use of intoxicating liquor.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1958, 72 Stat. 30, 31, Pub. L. 85-338, §§ 1, 2
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1018, Pub. L. 92-519, § 8
Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 11(a), 29 DCR 3138

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-717.
1973 Ed., § 40-609a.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this subchapter, see § 103(a)-(d) and (e)(1) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).

Editor's Notes

Section 103(a) and (e)(1) of D.C. Law 19-266 designated D.C. Law 4-145, §§ 2 and 3 as Subtitle A of Title I of the act.

Section 103(b) of D.C. Law 19-266 designated D.C. Law 4-145, §§ 4 to 11 as Title II of the act.

Section 103(c) of D.C. Law 19-266 designated D.C. Law 4-145, §§ 12 and 13 as Title III of the act.

Section 103(d) of D.C. Law 19-266 designated D.C. Law 4-145, § 14 as Title IV of the act.